Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 2. Ballots.
§ 24.2-622.
Unofficial sample ballots.

Sample ballots not authorized by electoral boards and provided by electoral boards or general registrars to precincts pursuant to §

24.2-641

are permitted to be printed and circulated, which includes publication in newspapers or on the Internet.

Such sample ballots shall not be printed on white paper and shall include on their face the words “sample ballot” in a font size no smaller than 24 point.

All sample ballots, excepting those official sample ballots authorized by electoral boards and provided by electoral boards or general registrars to precincts pursuant to §

24.2-641

, are advertisements for purposes of Chapter 9.5 (§

24.2-955

et seq.). Voters may take sample ballots into the voting booth or enclosure, but shall not give, tender, or exhibit such sample ballot to any person, other than an assistant designated under §

24.2-649

, while inside the polling place or within the prohibited area designated by §

24.2-604

.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-240; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-122; 1974, c. 428; 1979, c. 265; 1993, c. 641; 2002, c. 487; 2003, c. 1015; 2005, c. 370; 2006, cc. 787, 892; 2020, c. 283.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 487, in the second sentence, substituted “excepting those official sample ballots” for “including those,” substituted “advertisements” for “ ‘writings,’ ” and substituted “§ 24.2-943” for “§

24.2-1014

.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, in the first sentence, substituted “24” for “twenty-four” in clause (i), and inserted “or on the Internet” in clause (iii), and inserted “but shall not give, tender, or exhibit such sample ballot to any person, other than an assistant designated under §

24.2-649

, while inside the polling place or within the prohibited area designated by §

24.2-604

” at the end of the last sentence.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 370 inserted “or yellow” in clause (i) in the first paragraph; and inserted the present second paragraph.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 787 and 892 are identical, and substituted “Chapter 9.5 (§

24.2-955

et seq.)” for “§ 24.2-943” in the first sentence of the third paragraph.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 283, rewrote the first two paragraphs, which formerly read “Nothing contained in this title shall be construed to prohibit: (i) the printing and circulation of sample paper ballots, which are not printed on white or yellow paper and do include thereon the words ‘sample ballot’ in type no smaller than 24 point; (ii) the printing and circulation of sample voting equipment ballots, provided such sample ballots include on their face the words ‘sample ballot’; or (iii) the publication in newspapers or on the Internet of sample ballots of either type. Sample ballots, in whole or in part, other than the official sample ballots, shall not be printed on white or yellow paper”; and in the last paragraph, inserted “and provided by electoral boards or general registrars to precincts pursuant to §

24.2-641

.”

§ 24.2-623.
Ballot containers to be supplied by governing bodies; construction and custody.

The governing body of each county and city shall provide a ballot container for each precinct. The container shall have a lock and key and an opening of sufficient size to admit a single folded or unfolded ballot and no more. The containers shall be kept by the electoral boards for use in the precincts.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-241; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-123; 1993, c. 641; 2003, c. 1015; 2014, cc. 540, 576.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, substituted “container” for “box” in the first sentence, in the second sentence, substituted “container” for “box,” deleted “through the lid” following “opening,” and inserted “or unfolded,” and substituted “containers” for “boxes” in the last sentence.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 540, effective April 3, 2014, and c. 576, effective April 4, 2014, are identical, and deleted “and each part of a split precinct” at the end of the first sentence.

§ 24.2-624.
Opening and closing ballot containers; opening polls.

Immediately before the opening of the polls, an officer of election shall open the ballot containers in the presence of the political party or candidate representatives authorized to be present for the examination of voting equipment pursuant to §

24.2-639

, if such representatives are available. The officers shall inspect the containers to ensure that they are empty, lock them, and deliver the key to one of the officers. One of the officers shall forthwith proclaim that the polls are open. The containers shall not be opened until the close of the polls and shall then be opened for the purpose of counting the ballots therein. The containers shall be kept in view of those voting within the polling place during the hours of the election.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-242, 24-243; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-124; 1972, c. 620; 1993, c. 641; 2003, c. 1015.

Cross references.

For constitutional provisions as to method of voting, including treatment of ballot box, see Va. Const., Art. II, § 3.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, substituted “containers” for “boxes” throughout the section, and substituted “inspect the containers to ensure that they are empty” for “turn such boxes upside down so as to empty them” in the second sentence.